src-fst-morphology-phonology.bergsland.twolc.md
North Sámi morphophonological rule set                  

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

The file contains the rule set for the non-segmental
North Sámi morphophonological rules

Note that when copied over to newinfra, this file will be labeled sme-phon-L1.twolc.
The file sme-phon-L1.twolc will **not** be the source file to edit, 
rather, the source file will be this file, gt/sme/src/twol-sme.txt. This file (in the old infra)
is the ordinary sme fst file to be edited.
The L2 sme fst, on the other hand, will have lags/sme/src/phonology/sme-phon-L2.twolc
as its sourcefile, the file to be edited.

`º` is for CnsGrad of the `lg:lgg` and `lºl:ll` type
`¤:0` prevents ConsGrad in certain words
`'` is the real apostroph

* *ájºgi*
* *ái0gi*
* ★*mánnáX5jd* (is not standard language)
* ★*má0ná0jd* (is not standard language)

* *ájºgi*
* *ái0gi*

* *majdege*
* *maidege*

* ★*almmajX4in* (is not standard language)
* ★*almmai0in* (is not standard language)

* *mánnáX5jd*
* *má0ná0id*

* *almmájX4#*
* *almmái0#*

* *almmájX4X7-*
* *almmái00-*

* *almmájX4in*
* *almmáj0in*

* *barggož-*
* *barggoš-*

* *smirez-*
* *smires-*

* *Troandim#*
* *Troandin#*

* *Troandim-*
* *Troandin-*

* *muhtum#*
* *muhtun#*

* *skoalkkuh#*
* *skoalkkut#*

* *nagod#*
* *nagot#*

* *bávččag#*
* *bávččat#*

* *nuorab#*
* *nuorat#*

* *bávččag#*
* *bávččat#*

* *eamid#*
* *eamit#*

* *alih#*
* *alit#*

* *olmmož>X4X7-*
* *olmmoš>00-*

* *olmmož>X4#*
* *olmmoš>0#*

* *fijdnisY5t*
* *fiidná00t*

* ★*fijdnisY5t* (is not standard language)
* ★*fiidnás0t* (is not standard language)

* ★*fijdnisY5t* (is not standard language)
* ★*fiidnis0t* (is not standard language)

* *albmájY5*
* *albmá00*

* *olbmožY5*
* *olbmo00*

* *fijdnisY5t-*
* *fiidná00t-*

* *albmájY5-*
* *albmá00-*

* *olbmožY5-*
* *olbmo00-*

* *vuordild-*
* *vuordil0-*

* ★*vuordild-* (is not standard language)
* ★*vuordild-* (is not standard language)

* *attest-*
* *attes0-*

* ★*attest-* (is not standard language)
* ★*attest-* (is not standard language)

* *berošt#*
* *beroš0#*

* *bearjadah%ºk-*
* *bearjadat00-*

* ★*bearjadah%ºk-* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadat0k-* (is not standard language)

* ★*bearjadah%ºk-* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadah00-* (is not standard language)

* ★*bearjadah%ºk-* (is not standard language)
* ★*bearjadah0k-* (is not standard language)

* *muitaluss#*
* *muitalus0#*

* ★*vejolažž>-* (is not standard language)
* ★*vejolažž>-* (is not standard language)

* *vejolažž>-*
* *vejolaš0>-*

* ★*vejolažž>#* (is not standard language)
* ★*vejolaž0>#* (is not standard language)

* *johºkaX4*
* *jo00ga0*

* ★*johºkaX4* (is not standard language)
* ★*joh0ga0* (is not standard language)

* ★*johºkaX4* (is not standard language)
* ★*jo00ka0* (is not standard language)

* ★*johºkaX4* (is not standard language)
* ★*joh0ka0* (is not standard language)

* *sápmiX4*
* *sá0mi0*

* ★*sápmiX4* (is not standard language)
* ★*sápmi0* (is not standard language)

* *latnjaX4*
* *la0nja0*

* *vuodºjiQ4n*
* *vuo00já0n*

* *káffeX4s*
* *ká0fe0s*

* *RuottaX4s*
* *Ruo0ta0s*

* *áhkkuX4s*
* *áh0ku0s*

* *vielljaX4*
* *vie0lja0*

* *mannjiX4*
* *ma0nji0*

* *áddjáX4*
* *á0djá0*

* *lájºbiX4*
* *láibbi0*

* *seaŋºga>X4*
* *seaŋgga>0*

* *boŋºki>X4j#*
* *boŋkki>0i#*

* *boŋºki>X4jmet#*
* *boŋkki>0imet#*

* *sáfºtaX4*
* *sáftta0*

* *oabºnaX4*
* *oabnna0*

* *ámºtaX4*
* *ámtta0*

* *InºgáX4*
* *Inggá0*

* *gánºdaX4*
* *gándda0*

* *konseapºtaX4*
* *konseaptta0*

* *ájºruX4*
* *áirru0*

* *bievºlaX4*
* *bievlla0*

* *jarºlaX4*
* *jarlla0*

* *olºjuX4*
* *oljju0*

* *mátºkiX4*
* *mátkki0*

* *kreatºsaX4*
* *kreatssa0*

* *korpºsaX4*
* *korpssa0*

* *beasºkaX4*
* *beaskka0*

* *čoavºjiX4*
* *čoavjji0*

* *beajºviX4*
* *beaivvi0*

* *dujhºmiX4*
* *duihmmi0*

* *čuolbmaX4*
* *čuolmma0*

* *DálºmaX4*
* *Dálmma0*

* *sávdnjiX4*
* *sávnnji0*

* *čorbmaX4*
* *čorpma0*

* *skurdnjiX4*
* *skurtnji0*

* *návsºtuX4*
* *návsttu0*

* *boršºtaX4*
* *borštta0*

* *limšºkiX4*
* *limškki0*

* *ukºsaX4*
* *uvssa0*

* *teaksºtaX4*
* *teavstta0*

* *spábbaX4*
* *spáppa0*

* ★*Szczecin* (is not standard language)
* ★*Szccecin* (is not standard language)

* *Szczecin*
* *Szczecin*

* *eadniX4*
* *eatni0*

* *boadnjiX4*
* *boatnji0*

* *boahºtiY1*
* *boahtti0*

* *dahºkaY7j#*
* *dahkku0i#*

* *dahºka>Y7jmet#*
* *dahkku>0imet#*

* *dapmaY1*
* *dabmi0*

* *bitnjuY1*
* *bidnju0*

* *dadºjaY1*
* *daddji0*

* *johºkaX4*
* *jo00ga0*

* *gávºpiX7*
* *gáv0pe0*

* *bassiX7*
* *basse0*

* *buorriX7*
* *buorre0*

* *buorriX8*
* *buo0re0*

* *várriX7girºku*
* *várre0gir0ku*

* *lijgiX7#ruhºtaX4jd*
* *liige0#ru00đa0id*

* *čuorºvuQ6*
* *čuorvvo0*

* *boahºtiQ6*
* *boa00đe0*

* *lájºkiW1s#*
* *láikke0s#*

* *álºkiW2s#*
* *ál0ke0s#*

* *váttisW1*
* *váttes0*

* *headºjusW1-*
* *hea00jos0-*

* *headºjusW1*
* *hea00jos0*

* *váttisW1-*
* *váttes0-*

* *goahºtiX5jd*
* *go000đi0id*

* *viehºki¤X5jn*
* *vi0hkki00in*

* *boahºti>^DISIMPjmet#*
* *bo000đi>0imet#*

* *reŋºko>X2jd#*
* *reŋ0ku>0id#*

* *baste>X2j#*
* *basti>0i#*

* *asi#bealli>^DISIMPjde#*
* *asi#be00li>0ide#*

* *Line>X2j#*
* *Lini>0i#*

* *áhččiX2n*
* *áhččá0n*

* *stahta>X3j#*
* *stahti>0i#*

* *Sij9te>i#*
* *Sijte>i#*

* *fijdnisY5t*
* *fiidná00t*

* *oažžuQ8dit*
* *o0ččo0dit*

* *coahºkuX8stit*
* *coa00go0stit*

* *jearraQ1*
* *jearrá0*

* *boahºtiQ1*
* *boah0tá0*

* *jearraQ3n*
* *je0rro0n*

* *jearraQ2t*
* *je0rre0t*

* *boahºtiQ3n*
* *bo0h0to0n*

* *čuorºvuQ3n*
* *ču0r0vo0n*

* *jearraQ2*
* *je0rre0*

* *boahºtiQ2t*
* *bo0h0te0t*

* *čuorºvuQ2*
* *ču0r0vo0*

* *boahºtiQ4n*
* *boa00đá0n*

* *boahºtiQ5lin*
* *boa00đá0lin*

* *jearraY1*
* *jearri0*

* *jearraY2*
* *jearru0*

* *boahºtiY2*
* *boahttu0*

* *jearraQ2t*
* *je0rre0t*

boahºtiY4t ! It seems it should be Q3. ... both?!
* *boahºtiQ3t*
* *bo0h0to0t*

čuorºvuY4t ! Q2, it seems.
* *čuorºvuQ2t*
* *ču0r0vo0t*

* *jearraY7t#*
* *je0rro0t#*

* *boahºtiY7t#*
* *bo0htto0t#*

* *čuorºvuY7t#*
* *ču0r0vo0t#*

* *jearraY7juvvot#*
* *je0rro0juvvot#*

* *jearraY7j#*
* *je0rru0i#*

* *dahºkaY7j#*
* *dahkku0i#*

* *loikaY7j#*
* *loiku0i#*

* *beatnag8X4*
* *bea0na00*

* *luopmin8X4*
* *luo0mi00*

* *giellum8X4*
* *gie0lu00*

Changed because:we get almmáj- and not almmái-
Postvocalic j surfaces as i
Is this what we want?? without right context??? postvoc j:i <=> Vow: ( :0 ) (Dummy: ) _ ;

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.bergsland.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-sme/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.bergsland.twolc)</small>
